Utah statutes.
22-3-105.   Judicial control of discretionary power.
(1)  The court may not order a fiduciary to change a decision to exercise or
not to exercise a discretionary power conferred by this chapter unless it
determines that the decision was an abuse of the fiduciary's discretion.  A
fiduciary's decision is not an abuse of discretion merely because the court
would have exercised the power in a different manner or would not have
exercised the power.
(2)  The decisions to which Subsection (1) applies include:
(a)  A decision under Subsection 22-3-104(1) as to whether and to what extent
an amount should be transferred from principal to income or from income to
principal.
(b)  A decision regarding the factors that are relevant to the trust and its
beneficiaries, the extent to which the factors are relevant, and the weight,
if any, to be given to those factors, in deciding whether and to what extent
to exercise the discretionary power conferred by Subsection 22-3-104(1).
(3)  If the court determines that a fiduciary has abused the fiduciary's
discretion, the court may place the income and remainder beneficiaries in the
positions they would have occupied if the discretion had not been abused,
according to the following rules:
(a)  To the extent that the abuse of discretion has resulted in no
distribution to a beneficiary or in a distribution that is too small, the
court shall order the fiduciary to distribute from the trust to the
beneficiary an amount that the court determines will restore the beneficiary,
in whole or in part, to the beneficiary's appropriate position.
(b)  To the extent that the abuse of discretion has resulted in a distribution
to a beneficiary which is too large, the court shall place the beneficiaries,
the trust, or both, in whole or in part, in their appropriate positions by
ordering the fiduciary to withhold an amount from one or more future
distributions to the beneficiary who received the distribution that was too
large or ordering that beneficiary to return some or all of the distribution
to the trust.
(c)  To the extent that the court is unable, after applying Subsections (3)(a)
and (b), to place the beneficiaries, the trust, or both, in the positions they
would have occupied if the discretion had not been abused, the court may order
the fiduciary to pay an appropriate amount from its own funds to one or more
of the beneficiaries or the trust or both.
(4)  Upon petition by the fiduciary, the court having jurisdiction over a
trust or estate shall determine whether a proposed exercise or nonexercise by
the fiduciary of a discretionary power conferred by this chapter will result
in an abuse of the fiduciary's discretion.  If the petition describes the
proposed exercise or nonexercise of the power and contains sufficient
information to inform the beneficiaries of the reasons for the proposal, the
facts upon which the fiduciary relies, and an explanation of how the income
and remainder beneficiaries will be affected by the proposed exercise or
nonexercise of the power, a beneficiary who challenges the proposed exercise
or nonexercise has the burden of establishing that it will result in an abuse
of discretion.
